North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-24.1 Medical Marijuana
19-24.1-17.
Compassion centers — Registration certificates nontransferable — Notification of changes.

Upon application of a compassion center to the department, a registration certificate of a compassion center may be amended to authorize a change in the authorized physical location of the compassion center, or to amend the ownership or organizational structure of the compassion center with the registration certificate. A compassion center shall provide the department written notice of any change described under this section at least sixty calendar days before the proposed effective date of the change.

A registration certificate authorizing the operation of a compassion center is void by a change in ownership, substantial corporate change, change in location, or discontinued operation, without prior approval of the department. The department may adopt rules allowing for certain types of changes in ownership without the need for prior written approval from the department.

The department shall authorize the use of additional structures located within five hundred feet [152.40 meters] of the location described in the original application, unless the department makes an affirmative finding the use of additional structures would jeopardize public health or safety or would result in the cannabis business being within one thousand feet [304.80 meters] of a property line of a pre-existing public or private school. The department may waive all or part of the required advance notice to address emergent or emergency situations.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 194, § 1, effective March 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 18, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-18.
Compassion centers — Agents — Registry identification cards.

Upon issuance of a compassion center registry certificate, the department shall issue a registry identification card to each qualified compassion center agent associated with the compassion center.

To qualify to be issued a registry identification card, each compassion center agent must be at least twenty-one years of age and shall submit all of the following registry identification card application material to the department:

A photographic copy of the agent’s department-approved identification. The agent shall make the identification available for inspection and verification by the department.

A recent two-by-two inch [5.08-by-5.08 centimeter] photograph of the agent.

A written and signed statement from an officer or executive staff member of the compassion center stating the applicant is associated with the compassion center and the capacity of the association.

The name, address, and telephone number of the agent.

The name, address, and telephone number of the compassion center with which the agent is associated.

The agent’s signature and the date.

A nonrefundable application or renewal fee in the amount of two hundred dollars.

Each compassion center agent shall consent to a criminal history record check conducted under section 12-60-24 to demonstrate compliance with the eligibility requirements.

All applicable fees associated with the required criminal history record checks must be paid by the compassion center or the agent.

A criminal history record check must be performed upon initial application and biennially upon renewal. A compassion center agent shall consent to a criminal history record check at any time the department determines necessary.

An individual convicted of a drug-related misdemeanor offense within the five-year period before the date of application or a felony offense is prohibited from being a compassion center agent.

The department shall notify the compassion center in writing of the purpose for denying a compassion center agent application for a registry identification card. The department shall deny an application if the applicant fails to meet the registration requirements or to provide the information required, if the applicant previously had a registry identification card revoked, or if the department determines the information provided is false. The cardholder may appeal a denial or revocation of a registry identification card to the district court of Burleigh County for hearing. The court may authorize the cardholder to appear by reliable electronic means.

The department shall issue a compassion center agent a registry identification card within thirty calendar days of approval of an application.

A compassion center agent with a registry identification card shall notify the department of any of the following within ten calendar days of the change, in a manner prescribed by the department:

A change in the cardholder’s name or address; and

Knowledge of a change that would render the compassion center agent no longer eligible to be a cardholder.

If a compassion center agent loses the agent’s registry identification card, that agent shall notify the department in writing within twenty-four hours of becoming aware the card has been lost.

If a cardholder notifies the department of items listed in this section but the nature of the item reported results in the cardholder remaining eligible, the department shall issue the cardholder a new registry identification card with a new random ten-digit alphanumeric identification number within twenty calendar days of approving the updated information and the cardholder shall pay a fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars. If a cardholder notifies the department of an item that results in the cardholder being ineligible, the registry identification card immediately becomes void.

A compassion center shall notify the department in writing within two calendar days of the date a compassion center agent ceases to work for or be associated with the compassion center. Upon receipt of the notification, that individual’s registry identification card becomes void immediately.

The registry identification card of a compassion center agent expires one year after issuance or upon the termination of the compassion center’s registration certificate, whichever occurs first. To prevent interruption of possession of a valid registry identification card, a compassion center agent shall renew a registry identification card by submitting a complete renewal application no less than forty-five calendar days before the expiration date of the existing registry identification card.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 191, § 6, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 19, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-19.
Cardholders — Compassion centers — Revocation.

The department may suspend or revoke a cardholder’s registry identification card or a compassion center’s registration certificate for a material misstatement by an applicant in an application or renewal.

The department may suspend or revoke a registry identification card or registration certificate for a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

If a compassion center agent or a compassion center sells or otherwise transfers marijuana or usable marijuana to a person not authorized to possess marijuana or usable marijuana under this chapter, the department shall revoke the cardholder’s registry identification card or the compassion center’s registration certificate, or both. If the department revokes a cardholder’s registry identification card under this subsection, the cardholder is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

The department shall provide written notice of suspension or revocation of a registry identification card or registration certificate.

A suspension may not be for a period longer than six months.

A manufacturing facility may continue to produce and process and to possess marijuana and usable marijuana during a suspension, but may not transfer or sell usable marijuana.

A dispensary may continue to possess usable marijuana during a suspension, but may not purchase, dispense, or transfer usable marijuana.

The cardholder or the compassion center may appeal a denial or revocation of a registry identification card or registry certificate to the district court of Burleigh County for hearing. The court may authorize the cardholder or compassion center to appear by reliable electronic means.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-20.
Cardholders — Compassion centers — Violations — Penalties.

A cardholder or compassion center that fails to provide a notice as required under this chapter shall pay to the department a fee in an amount established by the department, not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, a manufacturing facility or a manufacturing facility agent is guilty of a class B felony for intentionally selling or otherwise transferring marijuana or usable marijuana in any form, to a person other than a dispensary, or for intentionally selling or otherwise transferring marijuana in any form other than usable marijuana, to a dispensary. A person convicted under this subsection may not continue to be affiliated with a compassion center and is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, a dispensary or a dispensary agent is guilty of a class B felony for intentionally selling or otherwise transferring usable marijuana, to a person other than a registered qualifying patient or a registered designated caregiver, to a registered qualifying patient who is a minor, or in a form not allowed under this chapter. A person convicted under this subsection may not continue to be affiliated with a compassion center and is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, a dispensary or a dispensary agent is guilty of a class B felony for intentionally selling or otherwise transferring usable marijuana, in a form other than pediatric medical marijuana, to a registered designated caregiver, for use by a registered qualifying patient who is a minor. A person convicted under this subsection may not continue to be affiliated with a compassion center and is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

A compassion center or compassion center agent that knowingly submits false records or documentation required by the department to certify a compassion center under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony. A person convicted under this subsection may not continue to be affiliated with a compassion center and is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, if a compassion center violates this chapter the department may fine the compassion center up to one thousand dollars for each violation.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, a registered qualifying patient who intentionally sells or otherwise transfers usable marijuana, to another person, is guilty of a class B felony. An individual convicted under this subsection is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty applicable in law, a registered designated caregiver who intentionally sells or otherwise transfers usable marijuana, to a person other than a registered qualifying patient to which the caregiver is associated with registration, is guilty of a class B felony. An individual convicted under this subsection is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

An individual who knowingly submits false records or documentation required by the department to receive a registry identification card under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. An individual convicted under this subsection may not continue to be affiliated with a compassion center and is disqualified from further participation under this chapter.

A health care provider who holds a financial interest in a compassion center may not knowingly refer a patient to a compassion center or to a registered designated caregiver, advertise in a compassion center, or issue a written certification. A health care provider who violates this subsection must be fined up to one thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 20, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-21.
Compassion centers — Dispensing.

A compassion center shall comply with the dispensing requirements of this section.

Design and security features of usable marijuana containers must be in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

A manufacturing facility or agent of the manufacturing facility may not dispense marijuana or usable marijuana, except the manufacturing facility or agent may sell usable marijuana to a dispensary.

A dispensary or agent of the dispensary may not dispense usable marijuana unless the dispensary first uses the verification system to confirm the registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver identification card is valid. A dispensary or agent of the dispensary:

May not dispense usable marijuana to a person other than a registered qualifying patient or a registered qualifying patient’s registered designated caregiver. If a registered qualifying patient is a minor:

The dispensary or agent of the dispensary may not dispense usable marijuana to a minor; and

The usable marijuana dispensed to the minor’s designated caregiver must be in the form of pediatric medical marijuana.

May not dispense to a registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver more than the allowable amount of usable marijuana and may not dispense an amount if it is known that amount would cause the recipient to purchase or possess more usable marijuana than is permitted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 8, effective April 24, 2019.

19-24.1-22.
Compassion centers — Inspections.

A compassion center is subject to random inspection by the department. During an inspection, the department may review the compassion center’s records, including the compassion center’s financial and dispensing records, which may track transactions according to registered qualifying patient and registered designated caregiver registry identification numbers.

The department shall conduct inspections of compassion centers to ensure compliance with this chapter. The department shall conduct inspections of manufacturing facilities for the presence of contaminants. The department shall select a certified laboratory to conduct random quality sampling testing, in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter. A compassion center shall pay the cost of all random quality sampling testing.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-23.
Compassion centers — Pesticide testing.

A manufacturing facility shall test marijuana at a manufacturing facility for the presence of pesticides. If a marijuana pesticide test or a random quality sampling test under section 19-24.1-22 indicates the presence of a pesticide, the manufacturing facility shall report the test result immediately to the department and to the agriculture commissioner. Upon the order of the department or agriculture commissioner, the manufacturing facility immediately shall destroy all affected or contaminated marijuana and usable marijuana inventory in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter, and shall certify to the department and to the agriculture commissioner that all affected or contaminated inventory has been destroyed.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-24.
Compassion centers — Cannabis plants. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A manufacturing facility shall grow an amount of marijuana sufficient to meet the qualifying patient population demands. For every five hundred plants in excess of one thousand plants a manufacturing facility possesses, the manufacturing facility shall pay the department an additional certification fee of ten thousand dollars. This fee is due at the time of increase and again at renewal of the compassion center registration certificate under section 19-24.1-16.

A dispensary may not possess more than three thousand five hundred ounces [99.22 kilograms] of usable marijuana at any time, regardless of formulation.

The health council shall adopt rules to allow a manufacturing facility to possess no more than an additional fifty plants for the exclusive purpose of department-authorized research and development related to production and processing. These plants are not counted in a manufacturing facility possession amount and are not subject to an additional fee.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 194, § 2, effective March 29, 2019.

19-24.1-24.
Compassion centers — Cannabis plants. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A manufacturing facility shall grow an amount of marijuana sufficient to meet the qualifying patient population demands. For every five hundred plants in excess of one thousand plants a manufacturing facility possesses, the manufacturing facility shall pay the department an additional certification fee of ten thousand dollars. This fee is due at the time of increase and again at renewal of the compassion center registration certificate under section 19-24.1-16.

A dispensary may not possess more than three thousand five hundred ounces [99.22 kilograms] of usable marijuana at any time, regardless of formulation.

The department shall adopt rules to allow a manufacturing facility to possess no more than an additional fifty plants for the exclusive purpose of department-authorized research and development related to production and processing. These plants are not counted in a manufacturing facility possession amount and are not subject to an additional fee.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 194, § 2, effective March 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 96, effective September 1, 2022.

19-24.1-25.
Compassion centers — Security and safety.

In compliance with rules adopted under this chapter, a compassion center shall implement appropriate security and safety measures to deter and prevent the unauthorized entrance to areas containing marijuana and containing usable marijuana and to prevent the theft of marijuana and usable marijuana.

A compassion center shall limit to authorized personnel entry to an area in which production or producing takes place or in which marijuana or usable marijuana is held.

A compassion center must have a fully operational security alarm system at the authorized physical address which includes an electrical support backup system for the alarm system to provide suitable protection against theft and diversion.

A compassion center shall maintain documentation in an auditable form for:

All maintenance inspections and tests conducted under this section, and any servicing, modification, or upgrade performed on the security alarm system;

An alarm activation or other event that requires response by public safety personnel; and

Any breach of security.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-26.
Compassion centers — Inventory control.

A compassion center shall comply with the inventory control requirements provided under this section and rules adopted under this chapter.

A manufacturing facility shall:

Employ a bar coding inventory control system to track batch, strain, and amounts of marijuana and usable marijuana in inventory and to track amounts of usable marijuana sold to dispensaries; and

Host a secure computer interface to transfer inventory amounts and dispensary purchase information to the department.

A dispensary shall:

Employ a bar coding inventory control system to track batch, strain, and amounts of usable marijuana in inventory and to track amounts sold to registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers; and

Host a secure computer interface to transfer inventory amounts and registered qualifying patient and registered designated caregiver purchase information to the department.

A compassion center shall store the compassion center’s marijuana and usable marijuana in an enclosed locked facility with adequate security, in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

A compassion center shall conduct inventories of marijuana and usable marijuana at the authorized location at the frequency and in the manner provided by rules adopted under this chapter. If an inventory results in the identification of a discrepancy, the compassion center shall notify the department immediately and appropriate law enforcement authorities within seventy-two hours. A compassion center shall document each inventory conducted by the compassion center.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 21, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-27.
Compassion centers — Operating manual — Training.

A compassion center shall maintain a current copy of the compassion center’s operating manual that meets the requirements of rules adopted under this chapter.

A compassion center shall develop, implement, and maintain on the premises an onsite training curriculum or shall enter contractual relationships with outside resources capable of meeting compassion center agent training needs. A compassion center shall ensure each compassion center agent receives training that includes:

Education regarding professional conduct, ethics, and state and federal laws regarding patient confidentiality;

Informational developments in the field of medical use of marijuana;

All safety and security measures required under section 19-24.1-25;

Specific procedural instructions for responding to an emergency, including robbery or violent accident; and

The compassion center’s operating manual and all requirements related to recordkeeping.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-28.
Compassion centers — Bylaws and operating agreements.

As part of a proposed compassion center’s initial application, the applicant shall provide to the department a current copy of the applicant’s bylaws or operating agreement. Upon receipt of a registration certificate, a compassion center shall maintain the bylaws or operating agreement in accordance with this chapter. In addition to any other requirements, the bylaws or operating agreement must include the ownership or management structure of the compassion center; the composition of the board of directors, board of governors, member-managers, or managers; and provisions relative to the disposition of revenues and earnings.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-29.
Compassion centers — Retention of and access to records and reports.

A compassion center shall keep detailed financial reports of proceeds and expenses. A compassion center shall maintain all inventory, sales, and financial records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The compassion center shall maintain for a period of seven years all reports and records required under this section. A compassion center shall allow the department, or an audit firm contracted by the department, access at all times to all books and records kept by the compassion center.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-30.
Compassion centers — Recordkeeping — Compassion center agents — Registry identification cards.

Each compassion center shall maintain:

In compliance with rules adopted under this chapter, a personnel record for each compassion center agent for a period of at least three years following termination of the individual’s affiliation with the compassion center. The personnel record must comply with minimum requirements set by rule adopted under this chapter.

A record of the source of funds that will be used to open or maintain the compassion center, including the name, address, and date of birth of any investor.

A record of each instance in which a current or prospective board member, member-manager, manager, or governor, who managed or served on the board of a business or not-for-profit entity and in the course of that service was convicted, fined, or censured or had a registration or license suspended or revoked in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

Each compassion center agent shall hold a valid registry identification card.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-31.
Verification system.

The department shall maintain a confidential list of cardholders and each cardholder’s address, phone number, and registry identification number.

The department shall establish a secure verification system. The verification system must allow law enforcement personnel, health care providers, pharmacists, compassion centers, and compassion center agents twenty-four-hour access to enter a registry identification number to determine whether the number corresponds with a current valid registry identification card. The system may disclose:

Whether an identification card is valid;

The name of the cardholder;

Whether the cardholder is a registered qualifying patient, registered designated caregiver, or registered compassion center agent;

Whether a registered qualifying patient is a minor; and

The registry identification number of any affiliated registered qualifying patient, registered designated caregiver, or compassion center.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-32.
Protections.

Except as provided in sections 19-24.1-20 and 19-24.1-33:

A registered qualifying patient is not subject to arrest or prosecution or the denial of any right or privilege, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional regulating entity for the acquisition, use, or possession of usable marijuana or related supplies under this chapter.

A registered designated caregiver is not subject to arrest or prosecution or the denial of any right or privilege, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional regulating entity:

For assisting a registered qualifying patient with the acquisition, use, or possession of usable marijuana or related supplies under this chapter, if the registered designated caregiver is connected to the registered qualifying patient through the department’s registration process.

For receiving compensation for costs associated with assisting a registered qualifying patient with the acquisition, use, or possession of usable marijuana or related supplies under this chapter, if the registered designated caregiver is connected to the registered qualifying patient through the department’s registration process.

It is presumed a registered qualifying patient is engaged in, or a registered designated caregiver is assisting with, the acquisition, use, or possession of usable marijuana or related supplies in accordance with this chapter if the registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver is in possession of a valid registry identification card and is not in possession of usable marijuana in an amount that exceeds what is authorized under this chapter. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence the conduct related to acquisition, use, or possession of usable marijuana or related supplies was not for the purpose of treating or alleviating the registered qualifying patient’s debilitating medical condition under this chapter.

A person is not subject to arrest or prosecution or the denial of any right or privilege, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional regulating entity, for being in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of marijuana authorized under this chapter.

A manufacturing facility is not subject to prosecution, search or inspection, or seizure, except by the department or a department designee, under this chapter for acting under this chapter to:

Produce or process or to conduct related activities for the sole purpose of selling usable marijuana to a dispensary; or

Transfer, transport, or deliver marijuana or usable marijuana to and from a department designee or manufacturing facility in accordance with this chapter.

A dispensary is not subject to prosecution, search or inspection, or seizure, except by the department or a department designee, under this chapter for acting under this chapter to:

Purchase usable marijuana from a manufacturing facility and conducting related activities for the sole purpose of dispensing usable marijuana, selling related supplies, and providing educational materials to registered qualifying patients and designated caregivers; or

Transfer usable marijuana to and from a department designee or related marijuana facility in accordance with this chapter.

A registered compassion center agent is not subject to arrest or prosecution or the denial of any right or privilege, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional regulating entity, for working or volunteering for a compassion center if the action performed by the compassion center agent on behalf of the compassion center is authorized under this chapter.

The sale and possession of marijuana paraphernalia by a dispensary is lawful if in accordance with this chapter.

The medical use of marijuana by a registered cardholder or the producing and processing and the dispensing of usable marijuana by a compassion center is lawful if in accordance with this chapter.

A health care provider is not subject to arrest or prosecution or the denial of any right or privilege, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional regulating entity, solely for providing a written certification or for stating in the health care provider’s professional opinion a patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the medical use of usable marijuana to treat or alleviate the patient’s debilitating medical condition or for refusing to provide written certification or a statement. This chapter does not release a health care provider from the duty to exercise a professional standard of care for evaluating or treating a patient’s medical condition.

A cardholder or registered compassion center is not subject to arrest or prosecution for use of drug paraphernalia or possession with intent to use drug paraphernalia in a manner consistent with this chapter.

A person in possession of medical marijuana waste in the course of transporting or disposing of the waste under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter may not be subject to arrest or prosecution for that possession or transportation.

A person in possession of marijuana, usable marijuana, or medical marijuana waste in the course of performing laboratory tests as provided under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter may not be subject to arrest or prosecution for that possession or testing.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 9, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 191, § 7, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 8, effective April 24, 2019.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-32 was amended 3 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1119; Section 9 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417; and Section 8 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283.

19-24.1-33.
Limitations. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

This chapter does not authorize a person to engage in, and does not prevent the imposition of any civil liability or criminal liability or other penalties for engaging in the following conduct:

Undertaking an activity under the influence of marijuana if doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice.

Possessing or consuming usable marijuana:

On a school bus or school van that is used for school purposes;

On the grounds of any public or private school;

At any location while a public or private school sanctioned event is occurring at that location;

On the grounds of a correctional facility; or

On the grounds of a child care facility or licensed home day care, unless authorized under rules adopted by the department of human services.

Undertaking any activity prohibited by section 23-12-09, 23-12-10, 23-12-10.2, 23-12-10.4, 23-12-10.5, or 23-12-11.

Using a combustible delivery form of usable marijuana or vaporizing usable marijuana under this chapter if the smoke or vapor would be inhaled by a minor who is not the registered qualifying patient for whom the usable marijuana is intended.

Operating, navigating, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, train, or motorboat, while under the influence of marijuana. However, a registered qualifying patient may not be considered to be under the influence of marijuana solely because of the presence of metabolites or components of marijuana that appear in insufficient concentration to cause impairment.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-33.
Limitations. [Effective September 1, 2022]

This chapter does not authorize a person to engage in, and does not prevent the imposition of any civil liability or criminal liability or other penalties for engaging in the following conduct:

Undertaking an activity under the influence of marijuana if doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice.

Possessing or consuming usable marijuana:

On a school bus or school van that is used for school purposes;

On the grounds of any public or private school;

At any location while a public or private school sanctioned event is occurring at that location;

On the grounds of a correctional facility; or

On the grounds of a child care facility or licensed home day care, unless authorized under rules adopted by the department.

Undertaking any activity prohibited by section 23-12-09, 23-12-10, 23-12-10.2, 23-12-10.4, 23-12-10.5, or 23-12-11.

Using a combustible delivery form of usable marijuana or vaporizing usable marijuana under this chapter if the smoke or vapor would be inhaled by a minor who is not the registered qualifying patient for whom the usable marijuana is intended.

Operating, navigating, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, train, or motorboat, while under the influence of marijuana. However, a registered qualifying patient may not be considered to be under the influence of marijuana solely because of the presence of metabolites or components of marijuana that appear in insufficient concentration to cause impairment.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 97, effective September 1, 2022.

19-24.1-34.
Acts not prohibited — Acts not required.

This chapter does not require:

A government medical assistance program or private insurer to reimburse a person for costs associated with the medical use of marijuana;

A person in lawful possession of property to allow a guest, client, customer, or other visitor to possess or consume usable marijuana on or in that property;

A landlord to allow production or processing on rental property; or

A health care provider to provide a written certification or otherwise recommend marijuana to a patient.

This chapter does not prohibit an employer from disciplining an employee for possessing or consuming usable marijuana in the workplace or for working while under the influence of marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-35.
Facility restrictions.

A basic care facility, nursing facility, assisted living facility, adult day care facility, or adult foster care home licensed in the state may adopt reasonable restrictions on the medical use of marijuana by residents or individuals receiving inpatient services, including:

The facility will not store or maintain the registered qualifying patient’s supply of usable marijuana.

The facility, caregivers, or hospice agencies serving the facility’s residents are not responsible for providing the usable marijuana for registered qualifying patients or assisting with the medical use of marijuana.

Usable marijuana can be consumed by a method other than vaporizing or combustion.

Consumption of usable marijuana is limited to a place specified by the facility.

A facility listed in subsection 1 may not unreasonably limit a registered qualifying patient’s medical use of marijuana as authorized under this chapter unless failing to do so would cause the facility to lose a monetary or licensing-related benefit under federal law or regulations.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-36.
Health council — Rules. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health council shall adopt rules as necessary for the implementation and administration of this chapter, including transportation and storage of marijuana and usable marijuana, advertising, packaging and labeling, standards for testing facilities, inventory management, and accurate recordkeeping.

The health council may adopt rules regarding the operation and governance of additional categories of registered medical marijuana establishments.

The health council shall adopt rules to establish requirements for reporting incidents of individuals not authorized to possess marijuana or usable marijuana under this chapter and who are found in possession of marijuana or usable marijuana. The rules must identify professionals required to report, the information the reporter is required to report, and actions the reporter shall take to secure the marijuana or usable marijuana.

The health council shall adopt rules to establish requirements for law enforcement officials and health care professionals to report to the department incidents involving overdose or adverse reaction related to the use of usable marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-36
Rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall adopt rules as necessary for the implementation and administration of this chapter, including transportation and storage of marijuana and usable marijuana, advertising, packaging and labeling, standards for testing facilities, inventory management, and accurate recordkeeping.

The department may adopt rules regarding the operation and governance of additional categories of registered medical marijuana establishments.

The department shall adopt rules to establish requirements for reporting incidents of individuals not authorized to possess marijuana or usable marijuana under this chapter and who are found in possession of marijuana or usable marijuana. The rules must identify professionals required to report, the information the reporter is required to report, and actions the reporter shall take to secure the marijuana or usable marijuana.

The department shall adopt rules to establish requirements for law enforcement officials and health care professionals to report to the department incidents involving overdose or adverse reaction related to the use of usable marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 98, effective September 1, 2022.